West Virginia, session 2025, SB759.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 2. STATE RESPONSIBILITIES FOR CHILDREN. §49-2-106A. No requirement to be immunized. (a) Notwithstanding any federal requirement to the contrary, a kinship parent, a foster parent, an adoptive parent, and all the members of their respective households shall not be required to be immunized to be considered for kinship, foster, or adoptive placement. (b) A kinship parent, a foster parent, an adoptive parent, and all members of the respective households shall not be required to be produce immunization records as part of an eligibility determination for the consideration of a foster child or any home finding study. (c) The immunization status of the kinship parent, foster parent, adoptive parent, and all members of the respective households shall have no impact on the department's determination regarding placement of a child in the kinship parent, foster parent, or adoptive parent's care.